Utah statutes.
53-3-213.   Age and experience requirements to drive school bus or certain other carriers -- Misdemeanor to drive unauthorized class of motor vehicle -- Waiver of driving examination by third party certification.

(1) (a)  A person must be at least 21 years of age:

(i)  to drive any school bus;

(ii)  to drive any commercial motor vehicle outside this state; or

(iii)  while transporting passengers for hire or hazardous materials.

(b)  Subject to the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the division may grant a commercial driver license to any applicant who is at least 18 years of age and has had at least one year of previous driving experience.

(c)  It is a class C misdemeanor for any person to drive a class of motor vehicle for which he is not licensed.

(2) (a)  At the discretion of the commissioner and under standards established by the division, persons employed as commercial drivers may submit a third party certification as provided in Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, in lieu of the driving segment of the examination.

(b)  The division shall maintain necessary records and set standards to certify companies desiring to qualify under Subsection (2)(a).



Amended by Chapter 324, 2010 General Session

